Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-5310
Funding.

An authority may receive funding through grants and loans from the city that created the authority, from other municipalities, from the state, from the federal government, and from other public and private sources.

Laws 2017, LB97, § 10.